Utah statutes.
7-22-109.   Priority of claims in case of insolvency.

If the commissioner takes possession of the business and property of the escrow agent in accordance with Title 7, Chapter 2, Possession of Depository Institution by Commissioner, or if the escrow agent files or is involuntarily placed into bankruptcy, or if a receiver, conservator, or liquidator is appointed to administer the affairs of the escrow agent, the claims of persons for losses relating to funds or property held in escrow shall have the same priority as claims of depositors in Section 7-2-15.

